Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 7. RECEIPTS, DOCUMENTS OF TITLE, AND OTHER INSTRUMENTS

CHAPTER 252. BILLS OF LADING

Sec. 252.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Agent" includes an officer, employee, or receiver.

(2) "Bill of lading" means a document evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of transporting or forwarding goods. The term includes an air consignment note, air waybill, or other document for air transportation comparable to a bill of lading for marine or rail transportation.

(3) "Goods" means all things treated as movable for purposes of a contract of storage or transportation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.002. DUTIES OF RAILROAD COMMISSION. (a) In this section, "common carrier" does not include a pipeline company or express company.

(b) The Railroad Commission of Texas shall:

(1) prescribe forms, terms, and conditions for authenticating, certifying, or validating bills of lading issued by a common carrier;

(2) regulate the manner by which a common carrier issues bills of lading; and

(3) take other action necessary to carry out the purposes of Chapter 7.

(c) After giving reasonable notice to interested common carriers and to the public, the railroad commission may amend a rule adopted under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.003. AGENT WRONGFULLY FAILING OR REFUSING TO ISSUE BILL OF LADING. (a) In this section, "common carrier" does not include a pipeline company or express company.

(b) An agent of a common carrier may not after lawful demand fail or refuse to issue a bill of lading in accordance with Chapter 7 or a rule of the railroad commission.

(c) An agent who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by:

(1) confinement in the county jail for a term of not more than six months;

(2) a fine not to exceed $200; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.004. AGENT ISSUING FRAUDULENT BILL OF LADING. (a) In this section, "common carrier" does not include a pipeline company or express company.

(b) An agent of a common carrier may not with intent to defraud a person:

(1) issue a bill of lading;

(2) incorrectly describe goods or the quantity of goods in a bill of lading; or

(3) issue a bill of lading without authority.

(c) An agent who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for a term of not more than 10 years or less than two years.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.005. AGENT ISSUING ORDER BILL OF LADING IN DUPLICATE OR SET OF PARTS. (a) Except where customary in overseas transportation, an agent of a common carrier may not knowingly issue or aid in issuing an order bill of lading in duplicate or in a set of parts.

(b) An agent who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a felony punishable by:

(1) imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for a term of not more than five years; and

(2) a fine not to exceed $5,000.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.006. FRAUDULENTLY INDUCING ISSUANCE OF BILL OF LADING. (a) A person may not, with intent to defraud, induce an agent of a common carrier to:

(1) issue to the person a bill of lading; or

(2) materially misrepresent in a bill of lading issued on behalf of the common carrier the quantity of goods described in the bill of lading.

(b) A person who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for a term of not more than five years or less than two years.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.007. FRAUDULENTLY NEGOTIATING OR TRANSFERRING BILL OF LADING. (a) A person may not, with intent to defraud, negotiate or transfer a bill of lading that:

(1) is issued in violation of Chapter 7; or

(2) contains a false, material statement of fact.

(b) A person who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for a term of not more than 10 years.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.